Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Regulatory Commission of Alaska.

Sec. 42.08.220.
General powers and duties.

The commission shall

regulate, under the provisions of this chapter, an in-state natural gas pipeline that provides transportation by way of contract carriage;

require permits for the construction, enlargement in size or operating capacity, extension, connection and interconnection, operation, or abandonment of an in-state natural gas pipeline facility under the provisions of this chapter and subject to the same standards as certification in AS

42.08.330

;

to the extent necessary to perform the duties of the commission under this chapter, have access to, and may designate its employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine, the accounts, financial and property records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, and related reports kept by an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier, or kept for an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier by others, that directly affect the interests of the state and directly relate to in-state natural gas pipelines located in the state during normal business hours;

provide all reasonable assistance to the Department of Law in intervening in, offering evidence in, and participating in proceedings before an officer, department, board, commission, or court of another state or the United States involving an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier or an affiliated interest and affecting the interests of the state.

The commission may

review and approve recourse tariffs filed by an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier under this chapter;

review and approve contracts;

investigate, on its own motion or after receiving a formal complaint, a dispute

related to rules, regulations, services, practices, and facilities that are not subject to the dispute resolution provisions in an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier’s contracts or recourse tariff;

presented by a complainant that does not have a contract with the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier;

related to the conduct of an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier’s open season under AS

42.08.300

; to resolve the dispute, the commission may order an expansion of an in-state natural gas pipeline or order an open season under the terms provided for an expansion or open season in this chapter or AS

38.35.121(a)(4)

and (c); or

related to an unreasonable diminution in quantity or quality in the provision of service to a public utility that

is a violation of the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier’s tariff or contract with the public utility;

has not been resolved by the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier; and

will result in immediate injury, loss, or damage to the peace, health, safety, or general welfare of the public as clearly demonstrated by specific facts shown by affidavit or verified complaint;

adopt regulations that are necessary and proper to the performance of the duties of the commission under this chapter, including regulations governing practices and procedures of the commission; regulations adopted by the commission may not be inconsistent with state law;

initiate, intervene in, and appear personally or by counsel and offer evidence in and participate in, proceedings before an officer, department, board, commission, or court of this state involving an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier and affecting the interests of the state; and

appoint a qualified, unbiased, and impartial administrative law judge with experience in the general practice of law to conduct hearings under this chapter; the administrative law judge may perform other duties in connection with the administration of this chapter and other laws; an administrative law judge hired to conduct hearings under this chapter shall have been admitted to practice law for at least five years immediately before appointment under this paragraph.

Except with regard to a precedent agreement under AS

42.08.320(a)

that is filed before the issuance of a certificate, consideration of an application for a contract carriage certificate under AS

42.08.330

, and an initial recourse tariff under AS

42.08.350(a)

, the commission may extend a timeline required under this chapter if all parties of record consent to the extension or if, for one time only, before the timeline expires, the

commission reasonably finds that good cause exists to extend the timeline;

commission issues a written order extending the timeline and setting out its findings regarding good cause; and

extension of time is 30 days or less.

Except as provided in this chapter, the commission may not

require rates, rate design, or tariff rates or regulations;

require an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier to make a recourse tariff filing;

order a modification of a contract that is approved, considered approved, or filed under this chapter;

conduct further review or investigation of a contract that is approved, considered approved, or filed under this chapter; or

investigate a dispute under (b)(3) of this section if a complete formal complaint has not been filed with the commission within 60 days after the event giving rise to the complaint.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.230.
Commission decision-making procedures.

The commission shall comply with AS

42.04.080(a)

and expeditiously adjudicate all matters that come before the commission.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.240.
Publication of reports, orders, decisions, and regulations.

All reports, orders, decisions, and regulations of the commission shall be in writing. The commission shall notify all affected operators of in-state natural gas pipeline facilities and interested parties of reports, orders, decisions, and regulations as they are issued and adopted and, when appropriate, publish them in a manner that will reasonably inform the public or the affected consumers of the services of an in-state natural gas pipeline facility. The commission may set charges for costs of printing or reproducing and furnishing copies of reports, orders, decisions, and regulations. The publication requirement, as it pertains to regulations, does not supersede the requirements of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.250.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

The administrative adjudication procedures of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) do not apply to adjudicatory proceedings of the commission under this chapter, except that final administrative determinations by the commission are subject to judicial review under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) as provided in AS

42.08.530

.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations adopted by the commission.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.260.
Annual report.

The commission shall include in its annual reports under AS

42.05.211

and AS

42.06.220

a review of its activities under this chapter during the previous fiscal year. The report must address the regulation of in-state natural gas pipeline facilities in the state as of June 30 of each year and must contain details about the commission’s compliance with the performance measures in this chapter.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)